Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1534
Contract; probationary period required.

Any contract of employment entered into after September 9, 1993, between the teaching staff and a board which applies to the first two years of the employment of such teaching staff shall provide that the first two years of the employment of such teacher are a probationary period. Any such contract may be terminated during the probationary period without cause.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 56.